Tennessee, session 114, HB2035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-2-506(30), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(F) Effective September 1, 2026, there is created in the thirtieth judicial district
one (1) additional criminal court to be designated as part IX. The governor shall appoint
a person to serve as judge of part IX of the criminal court. The person so appointed
shall serve in that capacity until September 1, 2028, or until the person's successor is
elected and qualified. At the August 2028 general election, the qualified voters of the
thirtieth judicial district shall elect, in accordance with § 16-2-505, one (1) person to
serve as judge of part IX of the criminal court. The person so elected at the August 2028
general election shall hold office until September 1, 2030, or until the person's successor
is elected and qualified. Thereafter, the judge of part IX of the criminal court must be
elected for a full eight-year term.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-2-506, is amended by deleting
subdivision (30)(D).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2035
011504
- 1 -